Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1879.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 705 of the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, is amended to read:Section 705. (a) Membership dues deductions and maintenance of membership are proper subjects of bargaining with the proviso that as to the latter, the payment of dues and assessments while members, may be the only requisite employment condition.123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (b) The provision to an employe organization of a public employe's Social Security number, driver's license, State identification data, bank account or payment card data, passport number, taxpayer identification number, health insurance or medical information, home address, home telephone number, personal mobile telephone number or personal email address is not a proper subject of collective bargaining except as required by a collective bargaining agreement entered into prior to the effective date of this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1879PN2336 - 2 - 12345678910